Washington statutes.
RCW 10.29.130

Disqualification of judge from subsequent proceedings.

The judge serving as a special inquiry judge shall be disqualified from acting as a magistrate or judge in any subsequent court proceeding arising from such inquiry except alleged contempt for neglect or refusal to appear, testify, or provide evidence at such inquiry in response to an order, summons, or subpoena.

[ 1980 c 146 s 13.]